Maine, session 132, LD1098.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §4801, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Abbreviated school days. The following provisions apply to abbreviated school
days.
A. For the purposes of this subsection, "abbreviated school day" means any day that a
student is required to attend school or receives educational services for less time than
grade peers within the same school. This includes students placed in tutoring services
for less than a full school day.
B. For the purposes of this subsection, "abbreviated school day program" means a
program in which a student is required to attend an abbreviated school day for 10 or
more cumulative days in the same school year.
C. A school administrative unit may place a student in an abbreviated school day
program only after all of the following are satisfied:
(1) The decision to use an abbreviated school day program is based on the student's
individual medical or behavioral health needs and documented in:
(a) A health care directive or medical management plan;
(b) An individualized education plan or an individualized family service plan
as defined in the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 United
States Code, Section 1401 et seq. (2015); or
Page 1 - 132LR1267(01)

(c) A plan developed pursuant to the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29
United States Code, Section 794 (2015) or the federal Americans with
Disabilities Act of 1990, Title II, 42 United States Code, Section 12131 et seq.
(2009);
(2) Written documentation of the abbreviated school day program, which must
include:
(a) An explanation of how the student will meet the system of learning results
under section 6209 and receive full access to the general curriculum;
(b) Documentation of the number of hours of educational services per day to
be provided as part of the abbreviated school day program and the times the
services will be provided; and
(c) A description of the services, if any, to be provided to assist the student in
returning to a full school day as soon as possible; and
(3) The parent or foster parent provides informed and written consent for the
abbreviated school day placement after being informed of the following in writing:
(a) The student's right to have access to the same number of hours of instruction
and educational services that are provided to the majority of other students who
are in the same grade within the student's school administrative unit;
(b) The prohibition on the school administrative unit to place a student with a
disability in an abbreviated school day program without the required
documentation; and
(c) The parent's or foster parent's right, at any time, to withdraw consent for an
abbreviated school day program placement.
The requirements of this paragraph must be met every 45 school days until the student
returns to a full school day program unless the parent or foster parent provides informed
written consent to meet less frequently. For students already in an abbreviated school
day program, these requirements must be met prior to the start of the 2025-2026 school
year.
D. A school may not consider, recommend or implement an abbreviated school day
program due to a lack of school resources, including, but not limited to, staffing
resources, training resources and supportive services.
E. Upon receipt of a written revocation or objection to the abbreviated school day
program placement from a parent or foster parent, the school administrative unit
superintendent shall ensure that, within 5 school days, the student has access to the
same number of hours of instruction and educational services that are provided to the
majority of other students who are in the same grade within the student's school
administrative unit.
The requirements of this subsection do not apply when students have been removed from
school pursuant to generally applicable disciplinary procedures and the abbreviated school
day program is being provided during that period of removal.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR1267(01)